Tennessee, session 114, SB0019.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-6-112(a), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting:
(a) The attorney general and reporter has the authority to conduct an
investigation and has the authority to initiate the criminal prosecution of any judge,
chancellor, or judicial elected official, or district attorney general, or both, whenever:
(1) The attorney general and reporter receives information sufficient to
constitute probable cause to investigate whether any official may have violated
any state criminal law; and
(2)
(A) A decision to prosecute the official by the district attorney
general of the district in which the offense occurred or in which a portion
of the offense occurred may result in a personal, financial, or political
conflict of interest; or
(B) The attorney general and reporter receives a report of a
violation of § 8-31-103.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0019
000539
- 1 -